Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 941, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 251, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 941), is amended to read as follows:


Section 941. A. Upon receipt of notice of death of any person


which under Section 931 et seq. of this title is subject to


investigation, a representative death investigator from the Office


of the Chief Medical Examiner shall immediately initiate an


investigation and shall document in detail, by the end of his or her


assigned shift, all the known and available facts of the death scene


in the electronic database of the Chief Medical Examiner. Decedent

Req. No. 2482 Page 1


specimens, evidence, and photographs shall be sent to the Office of


the Chief Medical Examiner. The investigating official of the


Office of the Chief Medical Examiner may take charge of any object


or writing found on or near the body which is deemed necessary for


the purpose of establishing the cause and/or manner of death.


B. Upon conclusion of the investigation and determination that


such objects or writings are no longer needed as evidence, the


medical examiner or the medical examiner’s designee may deliver them


to the district attorney, law enforcement agency, or family for


disposition.


C. The investigating medical examiner or the medical examiner’s


designee shall have access at all times to any and all medical and


dental records and history of the deceased including, but not


limited to, radiographs and medical records in the course of his or


her official investigation to determine the cause and manner of


death. Such records may not be released to any other person by the


medical examiner, and the custodians of such records shall incur no


liability by reason of the release of such records to the medical


examiner.


D. 1. The body of the deceased shall be turned over to the


funeral director designated by the person responsible for burial


within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the decedent unless a


longer period is necessary to complete the required investigation.



Req. No. 2482 Page 2


2. The investigation shall be concluded and the case completed


within sixty (60) calendar days after the Office of the Chief


Medical Examiner assumes custody of the body, unless circumstances


exist that prevent adherence to this timeline.


E. Each investigation shall include:


1. A review of the medication, immunization, and medical


records of the deceased, as available through state health databases


or other sources;


2. An autopsy, if deemed necessary by the medical examiner to


determine the cause of death; and


3. Microscopic and toxicology studies, if deemed necessary by


the medical examiner to determine the cause of death.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 942, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 942. A. 1. Upon completion of an investigation, the


medical examiner shall reduce his or her findings to writing upon


the form supplied to the medical examiner which shall be promptly


sent to the Chief Medical Examiner by mail.


2. If the medical examiner finds that the deceased had illicit,


prescription or nonprescription drugs in his or her system at the


time of death, the medical examiner shall document in his or her


findings if the death was:


a. a natural or accidental death with drug involvement,


b. a homicide by drugs,

Req. No. 2482 Page 3


c. a suicide by drug overdose, or


d. a death with drug involvement, but the manner of death


could not be determined.


3. A fatality shall not be considered a drug-related death


unless the medical examiner determines that the drug or drugs


present in the deceased materially contributed to the death.


B. Copies of reports shall be furnished by the Chief Medical


Examiner to investigating agencies having official interest therein.


Copies of reports shall also be furnished to the spouse of the


deceased or any person within one degree of consanguinity of the


deceased upon request and within five (5) business days of the


request once the cause and manner of death have been determined and


the death certificate has been issued.


C. 1. The medical examiner shall document in the investigative


report any new medications, immunizations, or emergency


countermeasures administered to the deceased within ninety (90) days


before death.


2. If the medical examiner reasonably believes that suicide may


have caused the death, the medical examiner shall document on the


report that the death was a suicide, a probable suicide, or a


possible suicide, based on the available evidence.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2482 DC 1/15/2026 12:11:17 AM

Req. No. 2482 Page 4